North Carolina, session 2025, HB131.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-129.16A is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-129.16A. Credit for investing in renewable energy property.solar energy equipment.
(a) Credit. – A taxpayer that has constructed, purchased, or leased renewable energy
property qualifying solar energy equipment is allowed a credit equal to thirty-five percent (35%)
of the cost of the property equipment if the property equipment is placed in service in this State
during the taxable year. In the case of renewable energy property qualifying solar energy
equipment that serves a nonbusiness purpose, the credit must be taken for the taxable year in
which the property equipment is placed in service. For all other renewable energy property,
qualifying solar energy equipment, the entire credit may not be taken for the taxable year in
which the property equipment is placed in service but must be taken in five equal installments
beginning with the taxable year in which the property equipment is placed in service. Upon
request of a taxpayer that leases renewable energy property, qualifying solar energy equipment,
the lessor of the property equipment must give the taxpayer a statement that describes the
renewable energy property qualifying solar energy equipment and states the cost of the property.
equipment. No credit is allowed under this section to the extent the cost of the renewable energy
property qualifying solar energy equipment was provided by public funds. For the purposes of
this section, "public funds" does not include grants made under section 1603 of the American
Recovery and Reinvestment Tax Act of 2009."qualifying solar energy equipment" is equipment
described in G.S. 105-129.15(7)e.
(b) Expiration. – If, in one of the years in which the installment of a credit accrues, the
renewable energy property qualifying solar energy equipment with respect to which the credit
was claimed is disposed of, taken out of service, or moved out of State, the credit expires and the
taxpayer may not take any remaining installment of the credit. The taxpayer may, however, take
the portion of an installment that accrued in a previous year and was carried forward to the extent
permitted under G.S. 105-129.17.
(c) Ceilings. – The credit allowed by this section may not exceed the applicable ceilings
provided in this subsection.
(1) Business. – A ceiling of two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) applies to each installation of renewable energy property
qualifying solar energy equipment placed in service for a business purpose.
Renewable energy property Qualifying solar energy equipment is placed in
*H131-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
service for a business purpose if the useful energy generated by the property
equipment is offered for sale or is used on-site for a purpose other than
providing energy to a residence.
(2) Nonbusiness. – The following ceilings apply to renewable energy property
qualifying solar energy equipment placed in service for a nonbusiness
purpose:
a. One thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) per dwelling unit for solar
energy equipment for domestic water heating, including pool heating.
b. Three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per dwelling unit for
solar energy equipment for active space heating, combined active
space and domestic hot water systems, and passive space heating.
c. Eight thousand four hundred dollars ($8,400) for each installation of
geothermal equipment.
d. Ten thousand five hundred dollars ($10,500) for each installation of
any other renewable energy property.
(3) Eco-Industrial Park. – A ceiling of five million dollars ($5,000,000) applies
to each installation of renewable energy property qualifying solar energy
equipment placed in service at an Eco-Industrial Park certified under
G.S. 143B-437.08 for a business purpose described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(d) No Double Credit. – A taxpayer that claims any other credit allowed under this
Chapter with respect to renewable energy property qualifying solar energy equipment may not
take the credit allowed in this section with respect to the same property. equipment. A taxpayer
may not take the credit allowed in this section for renewable energy property qualifying solar
energy equipment the taxpayer leases from another unless the taxpayer obtains the lessor's written
certification that the lessor will not claim a credit under this Chapter with respect to the
property.equipment.
(e) Sunset. – Except for taxpayers covered by subsection (f) of this section, this section
is repealed effective for renewable energy property placed into service on or after January 1,
2016.
(f) Delayed Sunset. – This section is repealed effective for renewable energy property
placed in service on or after January 1, 2017, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section.
(g) Alternate Delayed Sunset. – This section is repealed effective for renewable energy
property utilizing renewable biomass resources placed in service on or after May 5, 2017.
(h) Delayed Sunset Conditions. – A taxpayer is eligible for the delayed sunset provided
by subsection (f) or (g) of this section if the taxpayer makes a timely application for the extension,
pays the application fee, and meets both of the following conditions on or before January 1, 2016:
(i) incurred at least the minimum percentage of costs of the project and (ii) completed at least the
minimum percentage of the physical construction of the project. For a project with a total size of
less than 65 megawatts of direct current capacity, the minimum percentage of incurred costs and
partial construction is at least eighty percent (80%). For a project with a total size of 65 megawatts
or more of direct current capacity, the minimum percentage of incurred costs and partial
construction is at least fifty percent (50%).
An application and payment must be filed with the Secretary on or before October 1, 2015.
The application must include the location of the project, an estimate of the total cost of the project,
the total anticipated credit to be claimed, and the total size in megawatt capacity of each project
proposed or under construction. The nonrefundable fee to be paid with the application is one
thousand dollars ($1,000) per megawatt of capacity, with a minimum fee of five thousand dollars
($5,000).
Page 2 House Bill 131-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
A taxpayer must provide the documentation required under this subsection to the Department
on or before March 1, 2016, to verify that the taxpayer meets the minimum percentage of incurred
costs and partial construction required to be eligible for the sunset extension:
(1) A written certification signed by the taxpayer that, prior to January 1, 2016, at
least the minimum percentage of the physical construction of the project was
completed and that at least the minimum percentage of the total cost of the
project was incurred.
(2) A notarized copy of a written report prepared by an independent engineer duly
licensed in the State of North Carolina with expertise in the design and
construction of installations of renewable energy property stating that at least
the minimum percentage of the physical construction of the project was
completed prior to January 1, 2016.
(3) A notarized copy of a written report prepared by a certified public accountant
duly licensed to practice in the State of North Carolina with expertise in
accounting for and taxation of renewable energy property and that was
prepared in accordance with AT Section 201 of the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants Standards for Agreed-Upon Procedures
Engagements stating that the minimum percentage of the total cost of the
project was paid or incurred as determined under Section 461 and other
relevant sections of the Code prior to January 1, 2016."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025.
House Bill 131-First Edition Page 3